Hawaii statutes.
[§425-160] Status as qualified foreign
limited liability partnership; cancellation. (a) The status of a
partnership as a qualified foreign limited liability partnership shall be
effective upon the filing of the statement of foreign qualification.

(b) Status as a qualified foreign limited
liability partnership shall continue, regardless of changes in the partnership,
until canceled pursuant to section 425-14 or revoked pursuant to section
425-164. Cancellation of a statement of foreign qualification is effective
when it is filed.

(c) The status of a partnership as a foreign
limited liability partnership and the liability of its partners shall not be
affected by errors in or amendments made to the information required to be
contained in the statement of foreign qualification under section 425-158. [L
2000, c 218, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next